test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v4_itte_kyytita_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kyytitä - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     kyytitä+V+Inf: kyytitä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kyytitten
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kyytittet
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kyytittee
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kyytittemmä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kyytittettä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kyytithään
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kyytittin
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kyytittit
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kyytitti
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kyytittimmä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kyytittittä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kyytithiin
     kyytitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kyytiny
     kyytitä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kyytitty
     kyytitä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kyytinheet
     kyytitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kyytitteevä
     kyytitä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kyytitteevät
     kyytitä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kyytittävä
     kyytitä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kyytittävät

     kyytitä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kyytittisin
     kyytitä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kyytittisit
     kyytitä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kyytittis
     kyytitä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kyytittisimä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kyytittisittä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: kyytittäis
     kyytitä+V+Pass+Cond: kyytittäis

     kyytitä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: kyytitte
     kyytitä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kyytikkää
     
     kyytitä+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: kyytittemässä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: kyytittemästä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: kyytittemhään
     kyytitä+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: kyytittemälä
     kyytitä+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: kyytittemättä
